North Dakota statutes. TITLE 21 Governmental Finance
CHAPTER 21-11 Natural Resources Development Bond Issue [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9]

21-11-01.
Declaration and finding of public purpose. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-02.
Application for loan — Form — Contents — Preference of applications. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-03.
Processing of application — Fee — Purpose. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-04.
Approval or rejection of application. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-05.
Approved application filed with industrial commission. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-06.
Disbursements of loan — Inspection fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-07.
Appropriation of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-08.
General obligation state of North Dakota bonds, natural resources power development series — Bond purpose. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-09.
Preparation of bonds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-10.
Sale and delivery of bonds — Deposit of proceeds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-11.
Bonds tax exempt. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-12.
Bonds a general obligation of the state of North Dakota. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-13.
Tax levy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-14.
Sinking fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-15.
Transfer of balance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-16.
Certificates of indebtedness against uncollected taxes. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-17.
Investment of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-18.
Protection of purchaser. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

21-11-19.
Limitation of action. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 493, § 9.